District of Columbia statutes.
21-2021

Territorial application.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, this chapter applies to:

(1)

Affairs and estates of a disappeared individual who is domiciled in the District and an individual to be protected who is domiciled in the District;

(2)

Property located in the District of a non-domiciliary who is a disappeared individual or an individual to be protected;

(3)

Property coming into the control of a guardian or conservator who is subject to the laws of the District; and

(4)

An incapacitated individual in the District.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632
1981 Ed., § 21-2021.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 1-301 of the Uniform Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Act (1982 Act).